Maryland, session 2026, SB0834.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–222.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0834*

SENATE BILL 834
(d) The Commission shall encourage and promote the efficient use and
conservation of energy in support of the greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals and
targets required under Title 2, Subtitle 12 of the Environment Article, established by the
Commission under § 7–223(b) of this subtitle, and specified in § 7–224(a)(2) of this subtitle
by:
(1) requiring each electric company and gas company to establish any
program or service that the Commission determines to be appropriate and cost–effective;
(2) adopting rate–making policies that provide, through a surcharge line
item on customer bills:
(i) full cost recovery of reasonably incurred costs for programs and
services established under item (1) of this subsection, including full recovery on a current
basis on or before January 1, 2028;
(ii) on or before December 31, 2032, the elimination of any unpaid
costs and unamortized costs that:
1. A. existed on December 31, 2024; or
B. were incurred before [January 1, 2028] JULY 1, 2026;
and
2. were accrued for the purpose of achieving statutory
targets for annual incremental gross energy savings;
(iii) compensation for any unpaid costs and unamortized costs under
item (ii) of this item at not more than each electric company’s and each gas company’s
average cost of outstanding debt; and
(iv) reasonable financial performance incentives and penalties for
investor–owned electric companies and gas companies, as appropriate; and
(3) ensuring that adoption of electric customer choice under Subtitle 5 of
this title and gas customer choice under Subtitle 6 of this title does not adversely impact
these goals and targets.
7–226.1.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, BEGINNING
ON JULY 1, 2026, A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT MAY NOT IMPLEMENT OR
ENFORCE THE PROVISIONS OF §§ 7–222 THROUGH 7–226 OF THIS SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 834 3
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL CONTINUE RATE–MAKING POLICIES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–222(D)(2)(II) OF THIS SUBTITLE UNTIL EACH ELECTRIC
COMPANY AND GAS COMPANY HAS RECOVERED ALL UNPAID COSTS AND
UNAMORTIZED COSTS THAT THE ELECTRIC COMPANY OR GAS COMPANY INCURRED
ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, FOR THE DEVELOPMENT AND IMPLEMENTATION OF
PROGRAMS REQUIRED UNDER § 7–222(D)(2)(I) OF THIS SUBTITLE THAT EXISTED ON
OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Public Service Commission shall report to the General Assembly, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, within 3 months after all electric
companies and gas companies subject to the provisions of Title 7, Subtitle 2, Part II of the
Public Utilities Article have recovered all unpaid costs and unamortized costs in accordance
§ 7–226.1(b) of the Public Utilities Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
(b) The report submitted under subsection (a) of this section shall include a
recommendation on whether the moratorium established in § 7–226.1(a) of the Public
Utilities Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, should be rescinded.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.